Missouri, session 2026, HB3381.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapters 49, 67, and 82, RSMo, are amended by adding thereto three new
sections, to be known as sections 49.301, 67.740, and 82.1060, to read as follows:
49.301. 1. The commission may, by order or ordinance, prohibit the collection of
any late fees or penalties on delinquent property taxes.
2. The order or ordinance under subsection 1 of this section may prohibit such
collection only in unusual circumstances or circumstances beyond the taxpayer's
control.
67.740. 1. The governing body of a constitutional charter county may, by order
or ordinance, prohibit the collection of any late fees or penalties on delinquent property
taxes.
2. The order or ordinance under subsection 1 of this section may prohibit such
collection only in unusual circumstances or circumstances beyond the taxpayer's
control.
82.1060. 1. The governing body of a city not within a county may, by order or
ordinance, prohibit the collection of any late fees or penalties on delinquent property
taxes.
2. The order or ordinance under subsection 1 of this section may prohibit such
collection only in unusual circumstances or circumstances beyond the taxpayer's
control.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.